Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 11 Local Police And Fire Pension And Relief Funds
24-11-203. Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.

The purpose of this section, which creates and establishes the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board, is to establish a state pension review board for all municipal firemen's relief and pension funds and policemen's pension and relief funds established under §§ 14-52-106, 24-11-401 — 24-11-403, 24-11-405 — 24-11-413, 24-11-416, 24-11-417, 24-11-422, 24-11-423, 24-11-425, 24-11-428 — 24-11-430, 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-820, which shall oversee all requests for benefit increases and review the annual financial reports and annual actuarial valuations required by this subchapter.

The Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board shall be composed of nine (9) persons as follows:

Two (2) firefighters, an active member, retired member, or a deferred retirement option plan participant, one (1) of whom shall be appointed by the Governor after consulting the Arkansas State Firefighters Association and the other after consulting the Arkansas Professional Fire Fighters Association and subject to confirmation by the Senate;

Two (2) police officers, an active member, retired member, or a deferred retirement option plan participant, to be appointed by the Governor after consulting the Arkansas Municipal Police Association and the Fraternal Order of Police and subject to confirmation by the Senate;

Three (3) persons to be appointed by the Governor after consulting the Arkansas Municipal League and subject to confirmation by the Senate;

One (1) person who is not a member, retirant, or beneficiary of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System and who is not a current or former member of the governing body of any political subdivision, to be appointed by the Governor from a list of persons submitted to the Governor by the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs; and

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration or the secretary's designee.

The Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board shall elect one (1) of its members as chair.

Members of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board who are appointed as employee members must be active members, retired firefighters or police officers, or deferred retirement option plan participants of local firemen's relief and pension funds and policemen's pension and relief funds established under §§ 14-52-106, 24-11-401 — 24-11-403, 24-11-405 — 24-11-413, 24-11-416, 24-11-417, 24-11-422, 24-11-423, 24-11-425, 24-11-428 — 24-11-430, 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-820.

Members of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board who are appointed as employer members shall be elected or appointed officials of municipalities or fire protection districts with established firemen’s relief and pension funds or policemen’s pension and relief funds.

However, employer members shall not be from the same municipality or fire protection district.

The normal term of office shall be four (4) years from January 1 next following the appointment.

Each member of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board shall continue to serve until a successor has been appointed and has qualified.

In the event any employee member of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board ceases to be an active or retired member or a deferred retirement option plan participant of a local pension fund, or any employer member of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board ceases to be an appointed or elected official of an employer or becomes a member of a local pension fund, or if the citizen member of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board becomes a member of a local pension fund or an elected or appointed official of an employer, or if any board member fails to attend three (3) consecutive meetings of the board, unless in each case excused for cause by the remaining board members attending the meeting or meetings, the member shall be considered as having resigned from the board, and the board shall declare by resolution the office of that member vacated.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of a member, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the office was previously filled.

From the time a vacancy in the office of a member occurs and the board has begun the steps to see that the vacancy will be filled and before the time the vacancy is filled, the members in office may elect a person by majority vote to fill temporarily the vacancy for the interim period, but in no event for a period longer than one (1) year.

The executive director and staff of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall serve as executive director and staff for the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.

The Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board or its designated members may meet in executive session with the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System or its designated members for the purposes stated in and subject to the provisions of § 25-19-106(c) concerning the boards' executive director, staff, or persons being considered for any of those positions.

When applicable, records created by or at the instruction of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board concerning the boards' executive director or staff shall be considered personnel records or job evaluation or performance records for purposes of and subject to the provisions of § 25-19-105(b)(12) and § 25-19-105(c).

The records in subdivision (g)(2)(B)(i) of this section may be made available to the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board or its designated members and the boards' executive director.

The board shall be responsible for reviewing and approving at least one (1) time annually all actions taken by the staff in regard to benefit increase requests and administration of the disclosure and reporting requirements under this subchapter.

All benefit increase determinations shall be made in compliance with the provisions of §§ 24-11-101 — 24-11-103.

The board shall have the power to make all rules necessary to enforce the laws governing funding standards and benefit levels for firemen's relief and pension fund and police pension and relief funds. Further, the board shall have the authority to make all rules necessary to assure continued tax qualification of each firemen's relief and pension fund and policemen's pension and relief fund that is subject to this subchapter.

All rules must be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq. In addition, all rules relating to continued tax qualification of such plans shall be specifically presented to the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs, or the Legislative Council when the General Assembly is not in session, for review prior to final adoption.

Expenses incurred by the board for performing annual actuarial valuations and for all other administrative services to local pension funds shall be paid from the revenues derived from premium taxes levied by the state on insurers for the support of fire and police retirement programs.

The board shall report its administrative and actuarial expenses budgeted for the current year to the Department of Finance and Administration by or on April 30 of each year.

The board shall establish a portion of the insurance tax revenues to use to meet its proper administrative expenses each year, but the board shall not be entitled to more than one percent (1%) of the insurance tax revenues.

Each member of the board may receive expense reimbursement and stipends under § 25-16-901 et seq.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 381, §§ 1, 2; 1985, No. 383, § 2; 1985, No. 992, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-5706, 19-5707; Acts 1987, No. 142, § 1; 1995, No. 132, § 1; 1995, No. 1266, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 234; 1999, No. 543, § 1; 1999, No. 670, § 1; 2001, No. 1542, § 1; 2005, No. 161, § 1; 2007, No. 73, § 1; 2013, No. 41, § 3; 2015, No. 1100, § 59; 2015, No. 1165, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 2898; 2019, No. 910, § 3561.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2014, No. 285, § 64, provided:

“FUNDING TRANSFER — FIRE AND POLICE PENSION. On or before June 15 of each fiscal year, the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board shall certify to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the amount of funding it recommends for disbursement in the ensuing fiscal year to under-funded municipal fire and police relief and pension plans as defined in Arkansas Code 24-11-217. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall then immediately transfer on his books and those of the State Treasurer amounts not to exceed the total amount recommended by the Board or the amount appropriated herein for the ensuing fiscal year, whichever is the lesser amount, from the Revenue Holding Fund Account to the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Guarantee Fund for distribution to the recommended under-funded plans.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2015.”

Pursuant to Acts 2015, No. 1165, §
10, subsection (d) is set out above as amended by Acts 2015, No. 1100, § 59. Subsection (d) was also amended by Acts 2015, No. 1165, § 3, to read as follows:

“(d)(1)

Members of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board who are appointed as employer members shall be elected or appointed officials of municipalities or fire protection districts with established policemen's pension and relief funds or firemen's relief and pension funds.

“(2)

However, employer members shall not be from the same municipality or fire protection district.”

Acts 2015, No. 1165, § 10, provided:

“The enactment and adoption of this act shall not repeal, expressly or impliedly, the acts passed at the regular session of the Ninetieth General Assembly. All such acts shall have the full force and effect and, so far as those acts intentionally vary from or conflict with any provision contained in this act, those acts shall have the effect of subsequent acts and as amending or repealing the appropriate parts of the Arkansas Code of 1987.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (a), deleted “24-11-810 [repealed]” following “24-11-809,” substituted “financial” for “accountant's” and “annual” for “biennial,” and deleted “and which shall oversee, invest, and administer the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Guarantee Fund as established by law” at the end; substituted “Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board” for “board” in (b)(1) and (b)(2); substituted “State Firefighters Association” for “Council of Professional Fire Fighters” in (b)(1)(A); added “or the director's designee” at the end of (b)(1)(E); substituted “Members of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board who are” for “Board members” in (c) and (d); deleted “both” preceding “employer members” in (d); substituted “member of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board” for “board member” in (e), (f)(2), and three times in (g)(1); in (j)(1), substituted “firemen's relief and pension fund” for “fire” in the first sentence, and inserted “relief and pension fund” in the second sentence; substituted “annual” for “biennial” in (k)(1); substituted “the board shall not” for “in no event shall the board” in (k)(3); and substituted “under” for “in accordance with” in (k)(4).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1100 substituted “after consulting” for “from a list submitted by” throughout (b)(1)(A) and (b)(1)(C); in (b)(1)(B), substituted “after consulting” for “one (1) from a list submitted by” and deleted “the other from a list submitted by” preceding “the Fraternal”; added “and subject to confirmation by the Senate” in (b)(1)(A) through (C); and deleted former (e).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1165 redesignated (d) as (d)(1) and (2); and substituted “policemen’s pension and relief funds or firemen’s relief and pension funds” for “firemen's or policemen's pension and relief funds” in (d)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” throughout (i)(1) and (i)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (b)(1)(E), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” and substituted “secretary’s designee” for “director’s designee”.

Cross References.

Local police and fire retirement system, § 24-10-101 et seq.

24-11-204. General financial objective of plan.

The general financial objective of each plan shall be to establish and receive contributions, expressed as percentages of active employee payroll or, in the case of volunteer fire department pension plans, expressed in dollar amounts, which will remain approximately level from year to year and which will not have to be increased for future generations of citizens.

More specifically, contributions received each year shall be sufficient both:

To fully cover the costs of benefit commitments being made to employees for their service being rendered in each year; and

To make a level payment which, if paid annually over a reasonable period of future years, will fully cover the unfunded costs of benefit commitments for service previously rendered.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 700, § 3; 1981, No. 286, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-5703.

24-11-205. Actuarial valuation.

The Executive Director of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board shall cause an actuarial valuation of each plan to be made annually to determine how well the plan is meeting the objectives set forth in § 24-11-204.

The actuarial valuation shall be prepared by an actuary under the supervision of the executive director, who shall establish and implement procedures for securing actuarial services.

Valuations shall be prepared each year or as required by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board for all or certain plans.

The executive director shall submit one (1) copy of the actuarial study to the local pension board and a summary of the findings to the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs.

Expenses incurred for performing the actuarial valuations shall be paid from the revenues derived from the premium taxes levied on insurers for the support of fire and police retirement programs.

The method and amount of the payment shall be made under § 24-11-203.

The report of each actuarial valuation shall include at least the following:

A summary of the plan benefits evaluated;

The level normal cost of plan benefits, expressed as a percent of active employee payroll or, in the case of volunteer fire department pension plans, expressed in dollar amounts, computed in accordance with generally accepted actuarial funding methods which produce a normal cost rate at least as high as the entry age normal cost funding method;

The accrued liabilities of the plan, which shall be equal to the present value of all future benefits for present plan participants minus the present value of all future normal cost contributions for present plan participants;

The contribution required to amortize unfunded accrued liabilities over a period not to exceed thirty (30) years. Unfunded accrued liabilities shall be equal to the accrued liabilities minus the plan's accrued assets, which are the plan's cash and investments;

The employer contribution required to provide for the normal cost of the plan plus the amount required to amortize the unfunded accrued liability of the plan;

Assumptions of future experiences that are appropriate for the fund in pursuing the general financial objective established by this subchapter.

Assumptions shall be made with respect to at least the following:

Investment return;

Pay increase assumptions.

If the pay increase assumption is a constant percentage for all active employee ages, the investment return rate percentage shall not exceed the pay increase percentage by more than two percent (2%) annually, compounded annually, and preferably not by more than one and one-half percent (1.5%).

If the pay increase assumptions are the total of a constant percent plus a changing percentage that decreases as age increases, the investment return rate percentage shall not exceed the constant percent of the pay increase assumptions by more than three percent (3%) annually, compounded annually, and preferably not by more than two percent (2%);

Mortality;

Withdrawal or turnover;

Disability;

Retirement ages; and

Change in active employee group size.

If the entire employee group size is assumed to increase, the increase shall be assumed to occur within the five-year period after the valuation date, and to an eventual active employee group size no more than one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of present size;

Changes in each assumption since the last actuarial valuation shall be noted; and

The actuary shall certify that, in his or her opinion, the assumptions used for the valuation produce results which, in the aggregate, are reasonable.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 700, § 3; 1981, No. 286, § 3; 1983, No. 512, § 2; 1985, No. 992, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-5703; Acts 1989, No. 374, § 1; 2013, No. 41, § 4; 2015, No. 1165, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “annually” for “biennially” in (a)(1); substituted “each year” for “at least for each odd-numbered year ending December 31” in (a)(3); substituted “shall” for “should” in (a)(5); substituted “made under” for “allowed by” in (a)(6); and substituted “thirty (30)” for “forty (40)” in (b)(4).

The 2015 amendment rewrote (b)(6).

24-11-206. Annual financial report.

Each plan shall cause to be prepared an annual financial report following the close of each fiscal year. The financial report shall contain at least the following information:

A summary of the benefits available to covered persons; and

The accounting information specified in § 24-11-207.

The annual financial report shall be filed with the Executive Director of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 700, § 2; 1981, No. 286, § 2; 1983, No. 512, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-5702.

24-11-207. Annual financial report — Duty of board of trustees.

The board of trustees of each plan shall annually cause a financial report to be prepared covering each plan fiscal year.

The annual financial report shall be prepared at the direction of the board of trustees and in accordance with reporting procedures established by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.

Each annual financial report shall include at least the following:

The plan's revenues and expenditures during the year.

The revenues shall include at least the annual total for each of the following items:

Employee contributions;

Employer contributions from the state;

Employer contributions, other;

Investment income:

Interest and dividends;

Gain or loss on sales;

Other (specify); and

The total of subdivisions (b)(1)(B)(i)-(iii) of this section;

The change in unrealized gain or loss from the previous year;

Other (specify); and

The total of subdivisions (b)(1)(B)(i)-(vi) of this section.

The expenditures shall include at least the annual total for each of the following items:

Refunds of employee contributions;

Benefits paid;

Administrative expenses;

Other (specify); and

The total of subdivisions (b)(1)(C)(i)-(iv) of this section.

The difference between revenues and expenditures is the change in plan reserve assets for the year; and

The plan reserve assets.

The reserve assets at year's end shall include at least the total for each of the following items:

Cash and bank checking accounts, noninterest-earning;

Bank deposits, interest-earning;

Savings and loan deposits, interest-earning;

Other cash equivalents, maturing in one (1) year or less;

United States Government securities;

Non-United States Government securities;

Mortgages;

Corporate bonds;

Corporate common and preferred stock;

Other (specify); and

The total of subdivisions (b)(2)(B)(i)-(x) of this section.

For actuarial valuation purposes, the assets will be valued on the method determined by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board in consultation with its actuary.

The individual who prepares the annual financial reports and the chair of the board of trustees shall certify that the information contained in the report is an accurate statement of these activities and was prepared in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter and by using the same method of accounting used in previous years.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 700, § 4; 1981, No. 286, § 4; 1983, No. 45, § 1; 1983, No. 512, § 3; 1985, No. 898, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-5704; Acts 1993, No. 999, § 1; 1999, No. 573, § 1; 1999, No. 711, §§ 1-3; 1999, No. 1293, § 1; 2011, No. 556, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “a financial” for “an accountant's” in (a)(1); rewrote (a)(2); substituted “annual financial” for “accountant's” in (b); substituted “shall include” for “exhibit shall show” in (b)(1)(B) and (b)(1)(C); in (b)(1)(B)(v), inserted “change in” and deleted “on corporate common or preferred stock, if using the option to include eighty percent (80%) of year-end market value” at the end; in (b)(2)(B), deleted “exhibit” following “assets” and substituted “include” for “show”; in (b)(2)(C), added “For actuarial valuation purposes” at the beginning and deleted “asset valuation” preceding “method”; deleted (b)(3) and (4); in (c), substituted “individual who prepares the annual financial reports and the chair of the board of trustees” for “accountant,” deleted “in his or her opinion” following “certify that,” inserted “and was prepared” and added “and by using the same method of accounting used in previous years” at the end.

24-11-208. Administration of underfunded plans.

The purpose of this section is to provide a method for the funding of benefits in certain underfunded plans. Some of the municipal fire and police pension funds established under §§ 14-52-106, 24-11-401 — 24-11-403, 24-11-405 — 24-11-413, 24-11-416, 24-11-417, 24-11-422, 24-11-423, 24-11-425, 24-11-428 — 24-11-430, 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-820, may run out of funds before all of the promised benefits have been paid to their members, retirants, and beneficiaries.

Annually, in conjunction with the actuarial valuations required by § 24-11-205, the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board shall identify those plans that are projected to deplete their assets within ten (10) years after the valuation date.

A plan so identified shall be declared a projected insolvent fund.

The Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board shall notify the board of trustees of each projected insolvent fund of its funded status and the options that are available to the fund to protect the benefits of its members, retirants, and beneficiaries.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1266, § 2; 2013, No. 41, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment deleted “24-11-810” following “24-11-809” in (a); and in (b)(1), substituted “Annually” for “Biennially” and “that” for “which.”

24-11-209. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Guarantee Fund, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 41, § 6. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 1266, § 3; 2011, No. 979, § 3.

24-11-210. Requirements for qualified plans under Internal Revenue Code.

This section shall be considered a part of the plan of each firemen's relief and pension fund and policemen's pension and relief fund that is subject to this subchapter. Each plan is intended to qualify under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 401(a), and is for the exclusive benefit of its members, retired members, and their survivors.

A member, retired member, or survivor of a member or retired member of a firemen's relief and pension fund or a policemen's pension and relief fund may not accrue a retirement pension, disability retirement allowance, death benefit allowance, Deferred Retirement Option Plan benefit, or any other benefit under the fund in excess of the benefit limits applicable to the fund under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 415. The Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board shall reduce the amount of any benefit that exceeds those limits by the amount of the excess.

If total benefits under this fund and the benefits and contributions to which any member is entitled under any other qualified plans maintained by the employer that employs the member would otherwise exceed the applicable limits under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 415, the benefits the member would otherwise receive from the fund shall be reduced to the extent necessary to enable the benefits to comply with the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 415, unless the employer has provided other rules that satisfy those requirements.

Any member or survivor who receives any distribution that is an eligible rollover distribution as defined by the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 402(c)(4), is entitled to have that distribution transferred directly to another eligible retirement plan of the member's or survivor's choice on providing direction to the firemen's relief and pension fund or any policemen's pension and relief fund regarding that transfer in accordance with procedures established by the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund or the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund.

The total salary taken into account for any purpose for any member or retired member who is an ineligible participant under any firemen's relief and pension fund or any policemen's pension and relief fund may not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) a year. This dollar limit shall be adjusted from time to time in accordance with guidelines provided by the United States Secretary of the Treasury. For purposes of this subsection, an “eligible participant” is a person who first became a member before 1996, and an “ineligible participant” is a member who is not an eligible participant.

In the event that a firemen's relief and pension fund or a policemen's pension and relief fund is terminated or partially terminated or employer contributions to the fund are discontinued completely, the rights of the members to their accrued benefits to the extent funded shall be nonforfeitable.

Distributions of benefits must begin not later than April 1 of the year following the calendar year during which the member becomes seventy and one-half (70½) years of age or terminates employment with the employer, whichever is later, and must otherwise conform to the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 401(a)(9).

If the amount of any benefit is to be determined on the basis of actuarial assumptions that are not otherwise specifically set forth for that purpose in this subchapter, the actuarial assumptions to be used are those earnings and mortality assumptions being used on the date of the determination by the fund's actuary and approved by the board. The actuarial assumptions being used at any particular time shall be treated for all purposes as a part of the rules of the firemen's relief and pension fund or the policeman's pension and relief fund. The actuarial assumptions may be changed by the actuary if approved by the board, but a change in actuarial assumptions may not result in any decrease in benefits accrued as of the effective date of the change.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this subchapter to the contrary, contributions, benefits, and service credit with respect to qualified military service will be provided in accordance with the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 414(u).

Subdivision (h)(1) of this section shall not preclude any person from receiving more generous treatment for military service pursuant to state law or the provisions of any firemen's relief and pension fund or any policemen's pension and relief fund if such treatment is not inconsistent with the tax qualification requirements.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 670, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 2899.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (g).

24-11-211. Arkansas Policemen's Pension Supplement Program.

There is created the Arkansas Policemen's Pension Supplement Program, to be administered by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.

As used in this section, “retired police officers” includes:

Police officers who are retired from active service; and

Police officers who remain actively employed while participating in the Arkansas Police Officers' Deferred Retirement Option Plan under a policemen's pension and relief fund.

The Policemen's Pension Supplement Program Fund is created to provide a state fund to provide financial assistance to certain retired police officers and their survivors who are receiving pensions from policemen's pension and relief funds.

The Policemen's Pension Supplement Program Fund shall be funded by that portion of those unallocated premium taxes levied on insurers for the support of police retirement programs that is transferred to the control of the board under § 24-11-215(c).

The board shall administer the program and make the payments called for under the program, including formulating necessary rules, procedures, and forms.

The board may retain one percent (1%) of the funds transferred for administrative expenses of the program.

Retired police officers and their survivors are eligible for the pension supplement under this program as follows:

A retired police officer or a survivor receiving retirement benefits from a local policemen's pension and relief fund of less than four hundred dollars ($400) per month shall receive a supplement under the program in an amount equivalent to raise his or her total benefits plus the supplement to four hundred dollars ($400) per month or the amount in subdivision (d)(2) of this section, whichever is greater; and

A retired police officer or a survivor currently receiving retirement benefits from a local policemen's pension and relief fund of four hundred dollars ($400) or more per month shall receive a supplement under the program of fifty dollars ($50.00) per month.

The payment shall be treated for all purposes as a supplement to the retirement benefits received by the person.

On or after July 1 of each fiscal year following the board's payments required by subsection (e) of this section, the board shall pay to the State Treasury the amounts transferred to the board under § 24-11-215(c) that exceed the amounts the board is required to pay under the program.

The program is effective July 1, 1999.

The first payments may be made under the program beginning July 31, 1999, and the first transfer under § 24-11-215(c) shall occur on July 25, 1999, and on each July 25 thereafter.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1452, § 3; 2001, No. 1543, §§ 1, 2; 2003, No. 1473, § 61; 2009, No. 654, § 3; 2013, No. 41, § 7.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted by Acts 1999, No. 1452, § 3, subsection (a) contained an additional subdivision that read as follows:

“Local and municipal police officers provide valuable services to the citizens of this state by risking their lives and health to protect the lives and property of our citizens. Upon their retirement or participation in a deferred retirement option plan, these police officers are provided retirement benefits through local police pension funds. These retired police officers and, if deceased, their survivors are expected to pay for all kinds of expenses after their retirement, some which are unexpected and can be extremely expensive. A program by which the state can provide a modest annual supplement to retirement benefits to defray unexpected expenses for retired police officers and their survivors will benefit all local police officers, local governments, and all citizens of the state.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment subdivided (a)(2), (b), (c), (e), and (g); substituted “under § 24-11-215(c)” for “pursuant to § 24-11-302(f)(4) [repealed]” in (b)(2) and (g)(2); rewrote (f); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment
substituted “Policemen's Pension Supplement Program Fund” for “fund” in (b)(2); substituted “may” for “shall” in (c)(2); and deleted (e)(1)(A) through (e)(2)(A) and redesignated (e)(2)(B) as (e).

24-11-212. Future Supplement Fund.

A Future Supplement Fund is created for the purpose of providing cost-of-living assistance and minimum-benefit-amount assistance to policemen's pension and relief funds and firemen's relief and pension funds.

The Future Supplement Fund shall be administered by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.

Each year the Future Supplement Fund shall receive moneys from the premium tax allocation under § 24-11-214 based on the total of the amounts listed in subdivision (d)(1) of this section.

Beginning on June 30, 2019, and continuing on June 30 of each following year, the Future Supplement Fund may distribute to local policemen's pension and relief funds and local firemen's relief and pension funds to pay retired members, beneficiaries, or members of a deferred retirement option plan the following:

Two thousand two hundred and forty dollars ($2,240) to each retired member, beneficiary, or member of the deferred retirement option plan of a policemen's pension and relief fund;

One thousand six hundred and twenty dollars ($1,620) to each retired member, beneficiary, or member of the deferred retirement option plan who was a paid member of a firemen's relief and pension fund; and

Three hundred dollars ($300) to each retired member or beneficiary who was a volunteer member of a firemen's relief and pension fund.

Beginning on June 30, 2020, and continuing each following year, the amounts listed in subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall be increased by a two-and-five-tenths-percent compound cost-of-living adjustment.

Beginning on June 30, 2020, and continuing each following year, the amount distributed to a paid member of the firemen's relief and pension fund shall be increased in seven (7) installments until the amount, beginning on June 30, 2026, is equal to the amount distributed to each member of the policemen's pension and relief fund.

At the time that there are no longer any members covered by local policemen's pension and relief funds and local firemen's relief and pension funds, any remainder of the Future Supplement Fund shall be transferred to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System to be used solely by a covered employer to defray the covered employer's employer contribution costs to the system.

The Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board may use an amount allocated in previous years that has not been distributed for the Future Supplement Fund to:

Ensure the distribution of an amount listed in subdivision (d)(1) of this section; and

Help offset a reduction described in § 24-11-215.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1543, § 3; 2003, No. 1373, § 1; 2005, No. 1962, § 112; 2007, No. 73, § 2; 2007, No. 849, § 1; 2019, No. 465, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Future Supplement Fund” for “Future supplement funds” in the section heading; substituted “A Future Supplement Fund is” for “A Future Supplement Fund-Police and a Future Supplement Fund-Fire are” in (a); substituted “The Future Supplement Fund” for “Future Supplement Fund-Police and Future Supplement Fund-Fire” in (b); rewrote (c) and (d); in (e), substituted “Future Supplement Fund” for “Future Supplement Fund-Police and Future Supplement Fund-Fire” and added “to be used solely by a covered employer to defray the covered employer's employer contribution costs to the system”; and added (f).